Massachusetts, session 194th, H2115.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27 of Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the word "27B" in line 68 and inserting in
place thereof the following:- 27H
SECTION 2. Section 27 of Chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby further amended
by inserting after the word "benefits" in line 100 the following:-
;provided, however, that the 3 year limitation period shall be tolled from the date that the
employee or a similarly situated employee files a complaint with the attorney general alleging a
violation of any of these sections until the date that the attorney general issues a letter
authorizing a private right of action or the date that an enforcement action by the attorney general
becomes final.
SECTION 3. Section 27F of Chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the word "benefits" in line 31 the following:-
of 2

;provided, however, that the 3 year limitation period shall be tolled from the date that the
employee or a similarly situated employee files a complaint with the attorney general alleging a
violation of any of these sections until the date that the attorney general issues a letter
authorizing a private right of action or the date that an enforcement action by the attorney general
becomes final.
SECTION 4. Section 27G of Chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the word "benefits" in line 21 the following:-
;provided, however, that the 3 year limitation period shall be tolled from the date that the
employee or a similarly situated employee files a complaint with the attorney general alleging a
violation of any of these sections until the date that the attorney general issues a letter
authorizing a private right of action or the date that an enforcement action by the attorney general
becomes final.
SECTION 5. Section 27H of Chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the word "benefits" in line 29 the following:-
;provided, however, that the 3 year limitation period shall be tolled from the date that the
employee or a similarly situated employee files a complaint with the attorney general alleging a
violation of any of these sections until the date that the attorney general issues a letter
authorizing a private right of action or the date that an enforcement action by the attorney general
becomes final.

of 2